Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1219
Registration fees; remitted to commission; when; form; duplicate copy.

All registration fees received by the county treasurers shall be remitted on or before the thirtieth day of the following month to the secretary of the commission. All remittances shall be upon a form to be furnished by the commission and a duplicate copy shall be retained by the county treasurer.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 19;

Laws 1996, LB 464, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 11;

Laws 2015, LB142, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB287, § 18.